District of Columbia statutes.
47-804

Service of notice.

Notice shall be deemed to be properly served on the date when mailed by first class mail.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 502(b)(2), 48 DCR 334

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(c) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b)(2) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).